New York, session 2025-2026, S466.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (e) of section 1111-a of the vehicle and traf- 2 fic law, as amended by chapter 479 of the laws of 1994, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 (e) 1. An owner liable for a violation of subdivision (d) of section 5 eleven hundred eleven of this article pursuant to a local law or ordi- 6 nance adopted pursuant to this section shall be liable for monetary 7 penalties in accordance with a schedule of fines and penalties to be set 8 forth in such local law or ordinance, except that in a city which, by 9 local law, has authorized the adjudication of such owner liability by a 10 parking violations bureau, such schedule shall be promulgated by such 11 bureau. The liability of the owner pursuant to this section shall not 12 exceed fifty dollars for [each violation] the first two violations with- 13 in a two year period, one hundred fifty dollars for the third violation 14 within a two year period, two hundred fifty dollars for the fourth 15 violation within a two year period, three hundred dollars for the fifth 16 violation within a two year period, and three hundred fifty dollars for 17 the sixth violation within a two year period; provided, however, that 18 such local law or ordinance may provide for an additional penalty not in 19 excess of twenty-five dollars for each violation for the failure to 20 respond to a notice of liability within the prescribed time period. 21 2. (i) The company by which a vehicle has been documented five times 22 within a two year period by a photo violation monitoring device for EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01955-01-5 S. 466 2 1 failure of an operator thereof to comply with traffic-control indi- 2 cations is insured shall be informed of all such documented violations 3 over the past two years. 4 (ii) The registration of a vehicle which has been documented six times 5 within a twenty-four month period by a photo violation monitoring device 6 for failure of an operator thereof to comply with traffic-control indi- 7 cations shall be suspended for a period of ninety days commencing ten 8 days after the notice of liability for the sixth violation has been 9 mailed. 10 (iii) This paragraph shall not apply to a rental vehicle, as defined 11 in section one hundred thirty-seven-a of this chapter. 12 3. The department shall, by certified mail, alert the owner of a 13 registered vehicle after the vehicle's fourth documentation in two years 14 by a photo violation monitoring device for failure of an operator there- 15 of to comply with traffic-control indications that the company by which 16 such vehicle is insured will be informed of all such violations over the 17 past two years and such vehicle shall be suspended for ninety days after 18 two more documentations. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, the 20 amendments made to subdivision (e) of section 1111-a of the vehicle and 21 traffic law made by section one of this act shall not affect the repeal 22 of such section and shall be deemed repealed therewith.